Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.920

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 120.

This chapter is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions and shall take effect July 1, 1969: PROVIDED, That no corporation existing on the effective date of this chapter shall be required to conform to the provisions of this chapter until July 1, 1971.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 110.]